Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Torrens Title Registration
38-36-184.
Requirements of instruments filed for registration.

Every writing and instrument required or permitted by this article to be filed for registration shall contain or have endorsed upon it the full name, place of residence, and post-office address of the grantee or other person acquiring or claiming any right, title, or interest under such instrument. Any change in residence or post-office address of such person shall be endorsed by the registrar of titles in the original instrument on receiving a sworn statement of such change. All names and addresses shall also be entered on all certificates. All notices required by or given in pursuance of the provisions of this article by the registrar of titles or by the court, after original registration, shall be served on the person to be notified; if a resident of the state of Colorado, as summonses in civil actions are served, and proof of such service shall be made as on the return of a summons. All such notices shall be sent by mail to the person to be notified, if not a resident of the state of Colorado, at his residence and post-office address, as stated in the certificate of title or in any registered instrument under which he claims an interest. The certificate of the registrar of titles, or clerk of court, that any notice has been served by mailing the same as provided in this section, shall be conclusive proof of such notice. The court may in any case order different or further service by publication or otherwise.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 344, § 81.

R.S. 08:

§ 797.

C.L.

§ 5007.

CSA:

C. 40, § 252.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-84.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-84.

38-36-185.
Adverse claim - filed - hearing - costs.

Any person claiming any right or interest in registered land, adverse to the registered owner, arising subsequent to the date of the original registration, if no other provision is made in this article for registering the same, may make a statement in writing, setting forth fully his alleged right or interest, and how or under whom acquired, and a reference to the volume and page of the certificate of title of the registered owner, and a description of the land to which the right or interest is claimed.

The statement shall be signed and sworn to, and shall state the adverse claimant’s residence, and designate a place at which all notices may be served upon him. This statement shall be entitled to registration as an adverse claim, and the court, upon the petition of any party in interest, shall grant a speedy hearing upon the question of the validity of such adverse claim and shall enter such decree thereon as equity and justice may require. If the claim is adjudged to be invalid, its registration shall be canceled. The court may award such costs and damages, including reasonable attorney’s fees, as it may deem just in the premises.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 344, § 82.

R.S. 08:

§ 798.

C.L.

§ 5008.

CSA:

C. 40, § 253.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-85.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-85.

38-36-186.
Fees paid registrar upon registration - disposition.

Upon the original registration of land under this article, and also upon the entry of a certificate showing title as registered owners in heirs or devisees, there shall be paid to the registrar of titles one-tenth of one percent of the valuation for assessment of the real estate on the basis of the last assessment for general taxation, as an assurance fund.

All sums of money received by the registrar, as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, shall be forthwith paid by the registrar to the county treasurer of the county in which the land lies for the purpose of an assurance fund under the terms of this article. It is the duty of the county treasurer, whenever the amount on hand in said assurance fund is sufficient, to invest the same, principal and income, and report annually to the district court the condition and income thereof. No investment of the funds, or any part thereof, shall be made without the approval of said court by order entered of record. Said fund shall be invested only in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 345, §§ 83, 84.

R.S. 08:

§§ 799, 800.

C.L.

§§ 5009, 5010.

CSA:

C. 40, §§ 254, 255.

CRS 53:

§§ 118-10-86, 118-10-87.

C.R.S. 1963:

§§ 118-10-86, 118-10-87.

L. 89:

(2) amended, p. 1126, § 56, effective July 1.

38-36-187.
Indemnity for loss due to mistake or misfeasance.

Any person sustaining loss or damage through any omission, mistake, or misfeasance of the registrar of titles, or of any examiner of titles, or of any deputy, or by the mistake or misfeasance of the clerk of the court or any deputy in the performance of their respective duties under the provisions of this article, and any person wrongfully deprived of any land or any interest therein through the bringing of the same under the provisions of this article, or by the registration of any other person as the owner of such land, or by any mistake, omission, or misdescription in any certificate or entry or memorial in the register of titles, or by any cancellation, and who by the provisions of this article is barred or precluded from bringing an action for the recovery of such land, or interest therein, or claim thereon, may bring an action against the treasurer of the county in which said land is situated for the recovery of damages to be paid out of the assurance fund.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 346, § 85.

R.S. 08:

§ 801.

C.L.

§ 5011.

CSA:

C. 40, § 256.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-88.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-88.

38-36-188.
Defendants to indemnity suit - judgment - how collected.

If such action is for recovery for loss or damage arising only through any omission, mistake, or misfeasance of the registrar of titles, or his deputies, or of any examiner of titles, or any clerk of court, or his deputy in the performance of their respective duties under the provisions of this article, the county treasurer shall be the sole defendant to such action. If such action is brought for loss or damage arising only through the fraud or wrongful act of some person other than the registrar or his deputies, the examiners of title, the clerk of the court, or his deputies, or arising jointly through the fraud or wrongful act of such other persons, and the omission, mistakes, or misfeasance of the registrar of titles or his deputies, the examiners of titles, or the clerk of the court, or his deputies, such action shall be brought against both the county treasurer and such persons.

In all such actions where there are defendants other than the county treasurer and damages have been recovered, no final judgment shall be entered against the county treasurer until execution against the other defendants shall be returned unsatisfied in whole or in part, and the officer returning the execution shall certify that the amount still due upon the execution cannot be collected except by application to the indemnity fund. Thereupon, the court, being satisfied as to the truth of such return, shall order final judgment against the treasurer for the amount of the execution and costs, or so much thereof as remains unpaid. The county treasurer shall, upon such order of the court and final judgment, pay the amount of such judgment out of the assurance fund. It is the duty of the county attorney to appear and defend all such actions. If the funds in the assurance fund at any time are insufficient to pay any judgment in full, the balance unpaid shall draw interest at the legal rate of interest and be paid with such interest out of the first funds coming into said fund.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 346, § 86.

R.S. 08:

§ 802.

C.L.

§ 5012.

CSA:

C. 40, § 257.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-89.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-89.

38-36-189.
When assurance fund not liable - maximum judgment.

The assurance fund shall not be liable in any action to pay for any loss, damage, or deprivation occasioned by a breach of trust, whether express, implied, or constructive, by any registered owner who is a trustee, or by the improper exercise of any power of sale in a mortgage or trust deed. Final judgment shall not be entered against the county treasurer in any action in this article to recover from the assurance fund for more than a fair market value of the real estate at the time of the last payment to the assurance fund on account of the same real estate.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 347, § 87.

R.S. 08:

§ 803.

C.L.

§ 5013.

CSA:

C. 40, § 258.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-90.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-90.

38-36-190.
Action must be brought within six years - exception.

No action or proceeding for compensation for or by reason of any deprivation, loss, or damage occasioned or sustained as provided in this article shall be made, brought, or taken except within the period of six years from the time when the right to bring or take such action or proceeding first accrued. If at the time when such right of action first accrued the person entitled to bring such action or take such proceeding is under the age of eighteen years, insane, imprisoned, or absent from the United States in the service of the United States or of this state, then such person, or anyone claiming from, by, or under him, may bring the action or take the proceeding at any time within two years after such disability is removed, notwithstanding the time before limited in that behalf has expired.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 347, § 88.

R.S. 08:

§ 804.

C.L.

§ 5014.

CSA:

C. 40, § 259.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-91.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-91.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 225, § 83, effective July 16.

38-36-191.
Alteration of certificate only on order of court.

No erasure, alteration, or amendment shall be made upon the register of titles after the entry of a certificate of title or a memorial thereon and the attestation of the same by the registrar of titles, except by order of the court. Any registered owner or other person in interest may at any time apply by petition to the court, upon the ground that registered interests of any description, whether vested, contingent, expectant, or inchoate, have terminated and ceased; or that new interests have arisen or been created which do not appear upon the certificate; or that an error, omission, or mistake was made in entering a certificate or any memorial thereon or any duplicate certificate; or that the name of any person on the certificate has been changed; or that the registered owner has been married, or if registered as married, that the marriage has been terminated; or that a corporation which owned registered land has been dissolved and has not conveyed the same within three years after its dissolution; or upon any other reasonable ground; and the court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the petition, after such notice as it may order to all parties in interest, and may order the entry of a new certificate or the entry or cancellation of a memorial upon a certificate, or grant any other relief upon such terms and conditions, requiring security if necessary, as it may deem proper.

This section shall not be construed to give the court authority to open the original decree of registration, and nothing shall be done or ordered by the court which impairs the title or other interest of a purchaser holding a certificate for value and in good faith, or his heirs or assigns, without his or their written consent.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 348, § 89.

R.S. 08:

§ 805.

C.L.

§ 5015.

CSA:

C. 40, § 260.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-92.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-92.

38-36-192.
Theft of certificate.

Certificates of title and duplicate certificates entered or issued under this article shall be subjects of theft, and anyone stealing any such certificate commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 349, § 90.

R.S. 08:

§ 806.

C.L.

§ 5016.

CSA:

C. 40, § 261.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-93.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-93.

L. 67:

P. 578, § 18.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 886, § 70, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 140, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1554, § 341, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

38-36-193.
Perjury.

Whoever knowingly swears falsely to any statement required by this article to be made under oath is guilty of perjury in the second degree and, upon conviction thereof, is liable to the statutory penalties therefor.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 349, § 91.

R.S. 08:

§ 807.

C.L.

§ 5017.

CSA:

C. 40, § 262.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-94.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-94.

L. 72:

P. 567, § 43.

38-36-194.
Fraudulently procuring certificate a felony.

Whoever fraudulently procures, or assists in fraudulently procuring, or is privy to the fraudulent procurement of any certificate of title or other instrument, or of any entry in the register of titles or other book kept in the office of the registrar of titles, or of any erasure or alteration in any entry in any such book or in any instrument authorized by this article, or whoever knowingly defrauds or is privy to defrauding any person by means of a false or fraudulent instrument, certificate, statement, or affidavit affecting registered land, commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 349, § 92.

R.S. 08:

§ 808.

C.L.

§ 5018.

CSA:

C. 40, § 263.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-95.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-95.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 886, § 71, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 141, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1555, § 342, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

38-36-195.
Forging seal or signature a felony.

Whoever forges, or procures to be forged, or assists in forging the seal of the registrar, or the name, signature, or handwriting of any officer of the registry office, in cases where such officer is expressly or impliedly authorized to affix his or her signature; or forges, or procures to be forged, or assists in forging the name, signature, or handwriting of any person whomsoever to any instrument which is expressly or impliedly authorized to be signed by such person; or uses any document upon which any impression or part of the impression of any seal of said registrar has been forged, knowing the same to have been forged, or any document the signature to which has been forged, commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 349, § 93.

R.S. 08:

§ 809.

C.L.

§ 5019.

CSA:

C. 40, § 264.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-96.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-96.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 886, § 72, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 852, § 142, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1555, § 343, effective October 1.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for amendments made to this section by chapter 216, L. 77, was changed from July 1, 1978, to April 1, 1979, by chapter 1, First Extraordinary Session, L. 78, and was subsequently changed to July 1, 1979, by chapter 157, § 23, L. 79. See People v. McKenna, 199 Colo. 452, 611 P.2d 574 (1980).

38-36-196.
Remedy against one criminally liable not affected.

No proceeding or conviction for any act declared to be a felony shall affect any remedy which any person aggrieved or injured by such act may be entitled to at law or in equity against the person who has committed such act or against his estate.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 350, § 94.

R.S. 08:

§ 810.

C.L.

§ 5020.

CSA:

C. 40, § 265.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-97.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-97.

38-36-197.
Docket fees - expenses of publication.

On the filing of any application for registration the applicant shall pay to the clerk of the court such docket and clerk fees as are provided by law for civil actions and proceedings.

Any defendant, on entering his appearance, shall pay to the clerk of the court such fees as are provided by law for costs in civil actions and proceedings.

Every publication in a newspaper required by this article shall be paid for by the party on whose application the order of publication is made in addition to the fees prescribed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The party at whose request any notice is issued shall pay for the service of the same, except when sent by mail by the clerk of the court or registrar of titles.

Any petitioner, respondent, or defendant, upon entering his appearance in any supplemental proceeding following the entry of the original decree of registration, shall pay such docket fee as is provided by law to be paid by a defendant in civil actions.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 350, § 95.

R.S. 08:

§ 811.

C.L.

§ 5021.

CSA:

C. 40, § 266.

CRS 53:

§ 118-10-98.

L. 63:

P. 778, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-10-98.

38-36-198.
Fees to be paid registrar - application of fees.

The fees to be paid to the registrar of titles shall be as follows:

At or before the time of filing of the certified copy of the application with said registrar, the applicant shall pay to said registrar the fee prescribed by section 38-36-186;

For granting certificates of title upon each application and registering the same, twenty dollars;

For registering each transfer, including the filing of all instruments connected therewith, and the issuance and registration of the instruments connected therewith, and the issuance and registration of the new certificates of title, twenty dollars;

When the land transferred is held upon any trust condition or limitation, an additional fee of five dollars;

For entry of each memorial on the register of titles, including the filing of all instruments and papers connected therewith, and endorsements upon duplicate certificates, ten dollars;

For issuing each additional owner’s duplicate certificate, mortgagee’s duplicate certificate, or lessee’s duplicate certificate, ten dollars;

For filing copy of will with letters testamentary, or filing copy of letters of administration and entering memorial thereof, ten dollars;

For the cancellation of each memorial or charge, ten dollars;

For each certificate showing condition of the register of titles, twenty dollars;

For any certified copy of any instrument or writing on file in his office, the same fees now allowed by law to county clerk and recorders for like service;

For any other service required or necessary to carry out this article, and not itemized in this section, such fee as the court determines and establishes.

One-half of all fees provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be collected by the registrar and paid to the county treasurer of the county in which the fees are paid, to be used for the current expenses of the county. All the remaining fees provided for in subsection (1) of this section shall be collected by said registrar and applied the same as the other fees of his office; but his salary as county clerk and recorder, as provided by law, shall not be increased on account of the additional duties, or by reason of the allowance of additional fees provided for in this article; and the said registrar, as such, shall receive no salary.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

Pp. 350, 351, §§ 96, 97.

R.S. 08:

§§ 812, 813.

C.L.

§§ 5022, 5023.

CSA:

C. 40, §§ 267, 268.

CRS 53:

§§ 118-10-99, 118-10-100.

L. 63:

P. 780, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§§ 118-10-99, 118-10-100.

L. 83:

(1)(a) to (1)(c) and (1)(e) to (1)(i) amended, p. 1468, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 91:

(1)(b) to (1)(i) amended, p. 710, § 10, effective July 1.

38-36-199.
Article liberally construed.

This article shall be construed liberally, so far as may be necessary for the purpose of carrying out its general intent, which is that any owner of land may register his title and bring his land under the provisions of this article, but no one is required to do so.

All laws and parts of laws, if any, necessarily in conflict with this article are repealed, but this article is not intended to interfere with the present system of recording, transferring, or dealing in any real estate, not brought under the provisions of this article.

History.

Source:
L. 03:

P. 352, §§ 98, 99.

R.S. 08:

§§ 814, 815.

C.L.

§§ 5024, 5025.

CSA:

C. 40, §§ 269, 270.

CRS 53:

§§ 118-10-101, 118-10-102.

C.R.S. 1963:

§§ 118-10-101, 118-10-102.

Editor’s note:

The repeal provided for in subsection (2) was originally enacted in 1903.